New York, session 2025-2026, S10287.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (d) of section 1812 of the New York city civil 2 court act, as amended by chapter 80 of the laws of 1992, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (d) Where a judgment has been entered in a small claims court and 5 remains unsatisfied, the small claims clerk shall, upon request, issue 6 information subpoenas, at nominal cost, for the judgment creditor and 7 provide the creditor with assistance on their preparation and use. 8 Notwithstanding section twelve hundred one of this act, the court shall 9 issue such information subpoenas to be served anywhere in the state upon 10 request. The court shall have the same power as the supreme court to 11 punish a contempt of court committed with respect to an information 12 subpoena. 13 § 2. Subdivision (d) of section 1812 of the uniform city court act, as 14 amended by chapter 80 of the laws of 1992, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 (d) Where a judgment has been entered in a small claims court and 17 remains unsatisfied, the small claims clerk shall, upon request, issue 18 information subpoenas, at nominal cost, for the judgment creditor and 19 provide the creditor with assistance on their preparation and use. 20 Notwithstanding section twelve hundred one of this act, the court shall 21 issue such information subpoenas to be served anywhere in the state upon 22 request. The court shall have the same power as the supreme court to 23 punish a contempt of court committed with respect to an information 24 subpoena. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08371-04-6 S. 10287 2 1 § 3. Subdivision (d) of section 1812 of the uniform district court 2 act, as amended by chapter 80 of the laws of 1992, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (d) Where a judgment has been entered in a small claims court and 5 remains unsatisfied, the small claims clerk shall, upon request, issue 6 information subpoenas, at nominal cost, for the judgment creditor and 7 provide the creditor with assistance on their preparation and use. 8 Notwithstanding section twelve hundred one of this act, the court shall 9 issue such information subpoenas to be served anywhere in the state upon 10 request. The court shall have the same power as the supreme court to 11 punish a contempt of court committed with respect to an information 12 subpoena. 13 § 4. Subdivision (d) of section 1812 of the uniform justice court act, 14 as amended by chapter 650 of the laws of 1991, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 (d) Where a judgment has been entered in a small claims court and 17 remains unsatisfied, the small claims clerk shall, upon request, issue 18 information subpoenas, at nominal cost, for the judgment creditor and 19 provide the creditor with assistance on their preparation and use. 20 Notwithstanding section twelve hundred one of this act, the court shall 21 issue such information subpoenas to be served anywhere in the state upon 22 request. The court shall have the same power as the supreme court to 23 punish a contempt of court committed with respect to an information 24 subpoena. 25 § 5. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 26 have become a law.